Connecticut, session 2026, SB00363.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to assessment
years commencing on or after October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Active renovation" means construction or repair work lasting not
less than ninety consecutive days and undertaken pursuant to an
approved building permit;
(2) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-148
of the general statutes; and
(3) "Vacant" means not occupied or actively used for greater than one
hundred eighty days, consecutive or nonconsecutive, in an assessment
year.
(b) Any municipality may, by vote of its legislative body, or, in a
municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting, its board of
selectmen, adopt an ordinance imposing an assessment on any real
property that is (1) vacant, (2) located in a zone that allows for
commercial use and not used for any residential purpose, (3) located at
ground level, if such real property is part of a building or structure
containing two or more levels, and (4) located in a defined area adopted
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 363
by the municipality in which such assessment is applicable. Such
assessment shall be at a rate determined by the municipality, provided
such rate does not exceed five dollars per square foot for any assessment
year during which such property remains vacant.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section,
no assessment shall be imposed on real property pursuant to this section
if:
(1) The owner of such real property is engaged in active renovation
of the property, or a permit application concerning such property is
pending;
(2) The owner identifies specific legal or regulatory barriers,
including pending litigation, environmental reviews or permitting
delays that have prevented occupancy or use of the real property during
the preceding assessment year; or
(3) Such real property has been impacted by a natural disaster, or is
deemed uninhabitable by state or local authorities.
(d) If a municipality adopts an ordinance imposing an assessment on
vacant real property pursuant to this section, such municipality shall
specify the form and manner of application for any owner of such
property to claim an exemption from such assessment pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Any assessment on real property pursuant to this section shall be
due and payable on the same date as real property taxes collected
pursuant to chapter 204 of the general statutes. Any such assessment
may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of section 12-111 of the
general statutes.
(f) Any assessment collected pursuant to this section shall be
deposited into a fund established by the municipality. Such fund shall
be used solely for infrastructure improvements, the remediation of
blight or the promotion of development in the area defined by the
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 363
municipality pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (b) of this section.
The proceeds of such fund shall not be used for operating expenses of
any kind or be considered a part of the municipal general fund.
Expenditures from such fund shall be authorized in the same manner as
any other capital expenditure of the municipality. Any income earned
by any moneys on deposit in such fund shall accrue to the fund.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and New section
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subdiv. (a)(1) was rewritten for clarity; in Subdiv. (b)(2), "zoned" was
changed to "located in a zone that allows", for accuracy; in Subdiv. (b)(4),
"identified" was changed to "adopted", for accuracy, and "in which such
assessment is applicable" was added for clarity; and in Subdiv. (c)(2), "or
use" was added after "occupancy", for accuracy.
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3